test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-jeaell_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jeäll u-stem dlo: # Noun - full paradigm
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom: jeäll
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill: jiâlˈlu
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc: jeälast
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com: jeälain
     jeäll+N+Ess: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Par: jeällad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe: [jeältaa, jeältää]
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen: jeälai
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc: jeälaid
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill: jeälaid
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc: jeälain
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com: jeälaivuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe: [jeälaitaa, jeälaitää]
